Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORKFORCE TRAINING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Rondo Community Land Trust, a nonprofit, to train local workers in culinary skills. Grant proceeds may be used for purposes including but not limited to capacity building, technical assistance, and culinary training. Of this amount, up to ten percent may be used by Rondo Community Land Trust for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end